test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-kytshom_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
#  The were proofread for golden standard by Larisa Ponomareva 2019-10-22
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


   Pronoun – кытшӧм: # Interrogative Pronoun 'Millainen / Какой'
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Nom: кытшӧм
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+Nom: кытшӧмӧсь
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Acc: [кытшӧмӧ, кытшӧмӧс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Gen: кытшӧмлӧн
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Abl: кытшӧмлісь
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Dat: кытшӧмлӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ins: кытшӧмӧн 
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Com: кытшӧмкӧт
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Car: кытшӧмтӧг
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Cns: кытшӧмла
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Cmpr: кытшӧмся
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ine: кытшӧмын
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ela: кытшӧмись
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ill: кытшӧмӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Apr: кытшӧмлань
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Egr: кытшӧмсянь
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Prl: кытшӧмӧт
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+TerI: кытшӧмӧдз
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+TerII: кытшӧмви
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprIne: кытшӧмланьын
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprEla: кытшӧмланись
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprIll: кытшӧмланьӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprEgr: кытшӧмланьсянь
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprPrl: кытшӧмланьӧт
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprTerI: кытшӧмланьӧдз
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprTerII: кытшӧмланьви


    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: кытшӧмӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: кытшӧмӧс
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: кытшӧмӧлӧн
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: кытшӧмӧлісь
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: кытшӧмӧлӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: кытшӧмнам 
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Com+PxSg1: кытшӧмӧкӧт
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Car+PxSg1: [кытшӧмӧтӧг, кытшӧмтӧгьям] 
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Cns+PxSg1: кытшӧмӧла
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1: кытшӧмӧся
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: кытшӧмам
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: кытшӧмсим
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: кытшӧмам
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Apr+PxSg1: [кытшӧмӧлань, кытшӧмланям]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Egr+PxSg1: [кытшӧмӧсянь, кытшӧмсяням]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: [кытшӧмӧттям, кытшӧмӧттим]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+TerI+PxSg1: [кытшӧмӧдззам, кытшӧмӧдззим]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+TerII+PxSg1: кытшӧмӧви
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprIne+PxSg1: [кытшӧмланям, кытшӧмӧланьын]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprEla+PxSg1: [кытшӧмланьсим, кытшӧмӧланись]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprIll+PxSg1: [кытшӧмланям, кытшӧмӧланьӧ]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg1: [кытшӧмӧланьсянь, кытшӧмланьсяням] 
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg1: [кытшӧмӧланьӧт, кытшӧмланьӧттям, кытшӧмланьӧттим]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg1: [кытшӧмӧланьӧдз, кытшӧмланьӧдззам, кытшӧмланьӧдззим]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg1: кытшӧмӧланьви


    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: кытшӧмыт
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: кытшӧмтӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: кытшӧмытлӧн
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: кытшӧмытлісь
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: кытшӧмытлӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: кытшӧмнат 
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Com+PxSg2: кытшӧмыткӧт
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Car+PxSg2: [кытшӧмыттӧг, кытшӧмтӧгьят]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Cns+PxSg2: кытшӧмытла
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2: кытшӧмытся
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: кытшӧмат
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: кытшӧмсит
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: кытшӧмат
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: [кытшӧмытлань, кытшӧмланят]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: [кытшӧмытсянь, кытшӧмсянят]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: [кытшӧмӧттят, кытшӧмӧттит]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+TerI+PxSg2: [кытшӧмӧдззат, кытшӧмӧдззит]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+TerII+PxSg2: кытшӧмытви
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprIne+PxSg2: [кытшӧмланят, кытшӧмытланьын]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprEla+PxSg2: [кытшӧмланьсит, кытшӧмытланись]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprIll+PxSg2: [кытшӧмланят, кытшӧмытланьӧ]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg2: [кытшӧмытланьсянь, кытшӧмланьсянят] 
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg2: [кытшӧмытланьӧт, кытшӧмланьӧттят, кытшӧмланьӧттит]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg2: [кытшӧмытланьӧдз, кытшӧмланьӧдззат, кытшӧмланьӧдззит]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg2: кытшӧмытланьви


    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: кытшӧмыс
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: кытшӧмсӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: кытшӧмыслӧн
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: кытшӧмыслісь
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: кытшӧмыслӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: кытшӧмнас 
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Com+PxSg3: кытшӧмыскӧт
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Car+PxSg3: [кытшӧмыстӧг, кытшӧмтӧгьяс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: кытшӧмысла
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: кытшӧмысся
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: кытшӧмас
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: кытшӧмсис
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: кытшӧмас
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: [кытшӧмыслань, кытшӧмланяс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: [кытшӧмыссянь, кытшӧмсяняс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: [кытшӧмӧттяс, кытшӧмӧттис]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+TerI+PxSg3: [кытшӧмӧдззас, кытшӧмӧдззис]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+TerII+PxSg3: кытшӧмысви
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprIne+PxSg3: [кытшӧмланяс, кытшӧмысланьын]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprEla+PxSg3: [кытшӧмланьсис, кытшӧмысланись]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprIll+PxSg3: [кытшӧмланяс, кытшӧмысланьӧ]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg3: [кытшӧмысланьсянь, кытшӧмланьсяняс] 
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg3: [кытшӧмысланьӧт, кытшӧмланьӧттяс, кытшӧмланьӧттис]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg3: [кытшӧмысланьӧдз, кытшӧмланьӧдззас, кытшӧмланьӧдззис]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg3: кытшӧмысланьви


    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: кытшӧмным
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: кытшӧмнымӧс
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: кытшӧмнымлӧн
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: кытшӧмнымлісь
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: кытшӧмнымлӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: кытшӧмнаным 
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Com+PxPl1: кытшӧмнымкӧт
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Car+PxPl1: [кытшӧмнымтӧг, кытшӧмтӧгьяным]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Cns+PxPl1: кытшӧмнымла
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl1: кытшӧмнымся
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: кытшӧманым
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: кытшӧмсиным
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: кытшӧманым
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: [кытшӧмнымлань, кытшӧмланяным]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: [кытшӧмнымсянь, кытшӧмсяняным]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: [кытшӧмӧттяным, кытшӧмӧттиным]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+TerI+PxPl1: [кытшӧмӧдззаным, кытшӧмӧдззиным]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+TerII+PxPl1: кытшӧмнымви
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprIne+PxPl1: [кытшӧмланяным, кытшӧмнымланьын]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprEla+PxPl1: [кытшӧмланьсиным, кытшӧмнымланись]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprIll+PxPl1: [кытшӧмланяным, кытшӧмнымланьӧ]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl1: [кытшӧмнымланьсянь, кытшӧмланьсяняным] 
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl1: [кытшӧмнымланьӧт, кытшӧмланьӧттяным, кытшӧмланьӧттиным]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl1: [кытшӧмнымланьӧдз, кытшӧмланьӧдззаным, кытшӧмланьӧдззиным]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl1: кытшӧмнымланьви


    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: кытшӧмныт
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: кытшӧмнытӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: кытшӧмнытлӧн
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: кытшӧмнытлісь
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: кытшӧмнытлӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: кытшӧмнаныт 
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Com+PxPl2: кытшӧмныткӧт
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Car+PxPl2: [кытшӧмныттӧг, кытшӧмтӧгьяныт]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Cns+PxPl2: кытшӧмнытла
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl2: кытшӧмнытся
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: кытшӧманыт
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: кытшӧмсиныт
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: кытшӧманыт
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Apr+PxPl2: [кытшӧмнытлань, кытшӧмланяныт]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: [кытшӧмнытсянь, кытшӧмсяняныт]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: [кытшӧмӧттяныт, кытшӧмӧттиныт]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+TerI+PxPl2: [кытшӧмӧдззаныт, кытшӧмӧдззиныт]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+TerII+PxPl2: кытшӧмнытви
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprIne+PxPl2: [кытшӧмланяныт, кытшӧмнытланьын]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprEla+PxPl2: [кытшӧмланьсиныт, кытшӧмнытланись]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprIll+PxPl2: [кытшӧмланяныт, кытшӧмнытланьӧ]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl2: [кытшӧмнытланьсянь, кытшӧмланьсяняныт] 
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl2: [кытшӧмнытланьӧт, кытшӧмланьӧттяныт, кытшӧмланьӧттиныт]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl2: [кытшӧмнытланьӧдз, кытшӧмланьӧдззаныт, кытшӧмланьӧдззиныт]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl2: кытшӧмнытланьви


    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: кытшӧмныс
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: кытшӧмнысӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: кытшӧмныслӧн
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: кытшӧмныслісь
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: кытшӧмныслӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: кытшӧмнаныс 
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Com+PxPl3: кытшӧмныскӧт
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Car+PxPl3: [кытшӧмныстӧг, кытшӧмтӧгьяныс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Cns+PxPl3: кытшӧмнысла
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3: кытшӧмнысся
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: кытшӧманыс
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: кытшӧмсиныс
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: кытшӧманыс
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: [кытшӧмныслань, кытшӧмланяныс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: [кытшӧмныссянь, кытшӧмсяняныс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: [кытшӧмӧттяныс, кытшӧмӧттиныс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+TerI+PxPl3: [кытшӧмӧдззаныс, кытшӧмӧдззиныс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+TerII+PxPl3: кытшӧмнысви
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprIne+PxPl3: [кытшӧмланяныс, кытшӧмнысланьын]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprEla+PxPl3: [кытшӧмланьсиныс, кытшӧмнысланись]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprIll+PxPl3: [кытшӧмланяныс, кытшӧмнысланьӧ]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl3: [кытшӧмнысланьсянь, кытшӧмланьсяняныс] 
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl3: [кытшӧмнысланьӧт, кытшӧмланьӧттяныс, кытшӧмланьӧттиныс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl3: [кытшӧмнысланьӧдз, кытшӧмланьӧдззаныс, кытшӧмланьӧдззиныс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl3: кытшӧмнысланьви


    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+Nom: кытшӧммез
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+Acc: [кытшӧммезӧ, кытшӧммезӧс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+Gen: кытшӧммезлӧн
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+Abl: кытшӧммезлісь
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+Dat: кытшӧммезлӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+Ins: кытшӧммезӧн 
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+Com: кытшӧммезкӧт
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+Car: кытшӧммезтӧг
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+Cns: кытшӧммезла
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+Cmpr: кытшӧммезся
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+Ine: кытшӧммезын
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+Ela: кытшӧммезісь
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+Ill: кытшӧммезӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+Apr: кытшӧммезлань
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+Egr: кытшӧммезсянь
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+Prl: кытшӧммезӧт
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+TerI: кытшӧммезӧдз
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+TerII: кытшӧммезви
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+AprIne: кытшӧммезланьын
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+AprEla: кытшӧммезланись
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+AprIll: кытшӧммезланьӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+AprEgr: кытшӧммезланьсянь
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+AprPrl: кытшӧммезланьӧт
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+AprTerI: кытшӧммезланьӧдз
    кытшӧм+Det+Interr+Pl+AprTerII: кытшӧммезланьви
